Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-263
School district; policy regarding firearms; requirements.

(1) Except as provided in section 79-265.01, each school district shall adopt a policy requiring the expulsion from school for a period of not less than one year of any student who is determined to have knowingly and intentionally possessed, used, or transmitted a firearm on school grounds, in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school being used for a school purpose or in a vehicle being driven for a school purpose by a school employee or his or her designee, or at a school-sponsored activity or athletic event. For purposes of this section, firearm means a firearm as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921. The policy shall authorize the superintendent or the school board or board of education to modify the expulsion requirement on an individual basis.

(2) Each school district shall provide annually to the State Department of Education:

(a) An assurance that the school district has in effect the policy required by subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) A description of the circumstances surrounding any expulsions imposed under the policy required by subsection (1) of this section, including:

(i) The name of the school concerned;

(ii) The number of students expelled from the school; and

(iii) The types of weapons concerned.

Laws 1995, LB 658, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-4,176.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 67;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 63.

Gun-free school zones, see section 28-1204.04.